California statutes. Insurance Code
(a) Every policy containing a life insurance benefit which does not contain a disability benefit provision of any type (e.g. premium waiver extension, extended death benefit in event of total disability, or payment of income for a specified period during total disability), shall be deemed to include a reasonable extension of benefits upon discontinuance of the policy if it provides the totally disabled employee the same rights of conversion to an individual life insurance policy at the time of discontinuance of the policy that such employee would have had if his employment or association membership had terminated on the same date.

The rights of conversion specified above need not be provided with regard to any amount of insurance for which the employee becomes insured under any replacement coverage.

(b) Every policy containing a life insurance benefit which contains a disability benefit provision of any type shall be deemed to include a reasonable extension of benefits upon discontinuance of the policy if it provides:

(1) Such discontinuance does not affect the disability benefit; and

(2) The rights of conversion described in (a) above shall apply to the amount the individual is insured for at the termination of the disability benefit unless the disability benefit is a payment of income for a specified period, in which event the rights of conversion would apply to the amount of life insurance, if any, remaining after the payment of income; and

(3) With respect to any amounts of life insurance provided under the policy to which no disability benefit provision applies, the rights of conversion described in (a) above shall apply.

No extension of life insurance under either a disability benefit or the rights of conversion specified above need be provided with regard to any amount of insurance for which the employee becomes insured under any replacement coverage.

(c) Every policy providing benefits for loss of time or a specific indemnity during hospital confinement, shall be deemed to include a reasonable extension of such benefits upon discontinuance of the policy if such discontinuance does not affect the benefit provided.

(d) Every policy providing hospital, medical or surgical benefits on an expense-incurred or service basis shall be deemed to include a reasonable extension of such benefits upon discontinuance of the policy if it provides benefits for covered expenses directly relating to the condition causing total disability existing at the time premium payments for the employee or dependent cease and incurred during a period of not less than 12 months thereafter, which period shall not be interrupted by discontinuance of the policy.

That extension of benefits may be terminated at such time as the employee or dependent is no longer totally disabled or at such time as a succeeding carrier may elect to provide replacement coverage to that employee or dependent without limitation as to the disabling condition.

(e) The benefits payable during any extension of benefits may be subject to all limitations or restrictions contained in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 888, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.3.

(a) Any carrier providing replacement coverage with respect to hospital, medical or surgical benefits on an expense-incurred or service basis within a period of 60 days from the date of discontinuance of a prior policy providing that hospital, medical or surgical benefits shall immediately cover all employees and dependents who were validly covered under the previous policy at the date of discontinuance, including all former employees entitled to continuation coverage under Section 10116.5, who are within the definitions of eligibility under the succeeding carrier’s policy, and who would otherwise be eligible for coverage under the succeeding carrier’s policy, regardless of any provisions of the policy relating to active full-time employment or hospital confinement or pregnancy. However, with respect to employees or dependents who are totally disabled on the date of discontinuance of the prior carrier’s contract or policy and entitled to an extension of benefits pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1399.62 of the Health and Safety Code, or pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10128.2, the succeeding carrier is not required to provide benefits for services or expenses directly related to any conditions which caused the total disability.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (a), until an employee or dependent entitled to coverage under a succeeding carrier’s policy pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section qualifies for full benefits by meeting all effective date requirements of the succeeding carrier’s policy, the level of benefits shall not be lower than the benefits provided under the prior carrier’s policy reduced by the amount of benefits paid by the prior carrier. The employee or dependent shall continue to be covered by the succeeding carrier until the earlier of the following dates:

(1) The date coverage would terminate for an employee or dependent in accordance with the provisions of the succeeding carrier’s policy.

(2) In the case of an employee or dependent who was totally disabled on the date of discontinuance of the prior carrier’s policy and entitled to an extension of benefits pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1399.62 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (d) of Section 10128.2, the date the period of extension of benefits terminates, or, if the prior carrier’s policy is not subject to this article, the date to which benefits would have been extended had the prior carrier’s policy been subject to this article.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this section, and except to the extent that benefits for the condition would have been reduced or excluded under the prior carrier’s policy, no provision in a succeeding carrier’s policy of replacement coverage which would operate to reduce or exclude benefits on the basis that the condition giving rise to benefits preexisted the effective date of the succeeding carrier’s policy shall be applied with respect to those employees, former employees entitled to continuation coverage under Section 10116.5, and dependents validly insured under the prior carrier’s policy on the date of discontinuance.

(d) In a situation where a determination of the prior carrier’s benefit is required by the succeeding carrier, at the succeeding carrier’s request, the prior carrier shall furnish a statement of benefits available or pertinent information, sufficient to permit verification of the benefit determination by the succeeding carrier.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (a), a succeeding carrier’s policy shall not exclude coverage of a dependent child who was covered by the previous carrier solely because the insured does not provide primary support for that dependent child.

(f) The fraudulent failure or refusal of an employee or dependent to disclose a preexisting condition to the succeeding carrier shall not be ascribed to the entire group and shall not alleviate the duty of a succeeding carrier under subdivision (a) to immediately cover all employees, former employees entitled to continuation coverage under Section 10116.5, and dependents who were validly covered under the previous policy on the date of discontinuance. Any denial of benefits on the basis of fraud shall be limited to the employee or dependent who committed the fraud.

(g) Except to the extent that benefits for the condition would have been reduced or excluded under the prior carrier’s contract or policy, no provision in the succeeding carrier’s contract, where an employee changes carriers due to a change in employment or other circumstances, that would operate to reduce or exclude benefits for the following congenital craniofacial anomalies: cleft lip and palate (as defined in ICD-9-CM Diagnosis Code 749, International Classification of Diseases, 9th Revision, Clinical Modification, Volume 1, Second Edition, September, 1980), acrocephalosyndactyly (as defined in ICD-9-CM Diagnosis Code 755.55, cranio only), and other congenital musculoskeletal anomalies (as defined in ICD-9-CM Diagnosis Code 756.0), on the basis that the condition giving rise to benefits preexisted the effective date of the succeeding carrier’s contract, shall be applied to those employees, former employees entitled to continuation coverage under Section 10116.5, and dependents validly covered under the prior carrier’s contract or policy on the date the prior contract or policy terminated when payment or services had been commenced by the previous carrier. That succeeding coverage shall otherwise be subject to all other provisions of the contract between the insured and the succeeding carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 489, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.4.

This article shall apply to all policies issued, delivered, amended, or renewed in this state after January 1, 1977. A policy subject to the provisions of this article which is issued, delivered, amended as to benefits, or renewed in this state on or after the effective date of amendments to this article made at the 1977–1978 Regular Session of the Legislature shall be construed to be in compliance with the provisions of this article and such amendments to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. California Cobra Program [10128.50. - 10128.59.]

10128.50.

(a) This article shall be known as the California Continuation Benefits Replacement Act, or “Cal-COBRA.”

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that continued access to health insurance coverage is provided to employees, and their dependents, of employers with 2 to 19 eligible employees who are not currently offered continuation coverage under the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1985.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that any federal assistance that is or may become available to qualified beneficiaries under this article be effectively and promptly implemented by the department.

(d) The commissioner, in consultation with the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care, may adopt emergency regulations to implement this article in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by making a finding of emergency and demonstrating the need for immediate action in the event that any federal assistance is or becomes available to qualified beneficiaries under this article. The adoption of these regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall be substantially similar to those adopted by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care under subdivision (d) of Section 1366.20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 3, Sec. 5.   Effective May 12, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.51.

(a) “Continuation coverage” means extended coverage under the group benefit plan under which an eligible employee or eligible dependent is currently covered, or, in the case of a termination of the group benefit plan or an employer open enrollment period, extended coverage under the group benefit plan currently offered by the employer.

(b) “Group benefit plan” has the same meaning as “health benefit plan” defined in Section 10700, including group policies of vision-only and dental-only coverage, provided pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10700) to an employer with 2 to 19 eligible employees, as defined in Section 10700.

(c) (1) “Qualified beneficiary” means any individual who, on the day before the qualifying event, is covered under a group benefit plan offered by a disability insurer pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 10700) of Chapter 8, and has a qualifying event, as defined in subdivision (d).

(2) “Qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA” means a qualified beneficiary, as defined in paragraph (1), who (A) was or is eligible for continuation coverage as a result of the involuntary termination of the covered employee’s employment during the period specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA, (B) elects continuation coverage, and (C) meets the definition of “qualified beneficiary” set forth in paragraph (3) of Section 1167 of Title 29 of the United States Code, as used in subparagraph (E) of
 paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA or any subsequent rules or regulations issued pursuant to that law.

(3) “ARRA” means Title III of Division B of the federal American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 or any amendment to that federal law extending federal premium assistance to qualified beneficiaries.

(d) “Qualifying event” means any of the following events that, but for the election of continuation coverage under this article, would result in a loss of coverage under the group benefit plan to a qualified beneficiary:

(1) The death of the covered employee.

(2) The termination of employment or reduction in hours of the covered employee’s employment, except that termination for gross misconduct does not constitute a qualifying
 event.

(3) The divorce or legal separation of the covered employee from the covered employee’s spouse.

(4) The loss of dependent status by a dependent enrolled in the group benefit plan.

(5) With respect to a covered dependent only, the covered employee’s entitlement to benefits under Title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act (Medicare).

(e) “Employer” means any employer that meets the definition of “small employer” as set forth in Section 10700 and (1) employed 2 to 19 eligible employees on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar year, or, if the employer was not in business during any part of the preceding calendar year, employed 2 to 19 eligible employees on at least 50 percent of its working days during the
 preceding calendar quarter, (2) has contracted for health care coverage through a group benefit plan offered by a disability insurer, and (3) is not subject to Section 4980B of the United States Internal Revenue Code or Chapter 18 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 1161 et seq.

(f) “Core coverage” means coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical benefits provided under the group benefit plan that a qualified beneficiary was receiving immediately prior to the qualifying event, other than noncore coverage.

(g) “Noncore coverage” means coverage for vision and dental care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 24, Sec. 6.   (SB 838)   Effective June 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.52.

The continuation coverage requirements of this article do not apply to the following individuals:

(a) Individuals who are entitled to Medicare benefits or become entitled to Medicare benefits pursuant to Title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act, as amended or superseded. Entitlement to Medicare Part A only constitutes entitlement to benefits under Medicare.

(b) Individuals who have other hospital, medical, or surgical coverage, or who are covered or become covered under another group benefit plan, including a self-insured employee welfare benefit plan, that provides coverage for individuals and that does not impose any
 exclusion or limitation with respect to any preexisting condition of the individual, other than a preexisting condition limitation or exclusion that does not apply to or is satisfied by the qualified beneficiary pursuant to Sections 10198.6 and 10198.7. A group conversion option under any group benefit plan shall not be considered as an arrangement under which an individual is or becomes covered.

(c) Individuals who are covered, become covered, or are eligible for federal COBRA coverage pursuant to Section 4980B of the United States Internal Revenue Code or Chapter 18 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, 29 U.S.C. Section 1161 et seq.

(d) Individuals who are covered, become covered, or are eligible for coverage pursuant to Chapter 6A of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 300bb-1 et seq.

(e) Qualified beneficiaries who fail to meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 10128.54 or subdivision (h) of Section 10128.55 regarding notification of a qualifying event or election of continuation coverage within the specified time limits.

(f) Except as provided in Section 3001 of ARRA, qualified beneficiaries who fail to submit the correct premium amount required by subdivision (b) of Section 10128.55 and Section 10128.57, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the policy or contract, or fail to satisfy other terms and conditions of the policy or contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 24, Sec. 7.   (SB 838)   Effective June 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.53.

(a) Every disability insurer, that provides coverage under a group benefit plan to an employer, including those policies and contracts that provide vision-only and dental-only benefits, as defined in Section 10128.51, shall offer continuation coverage, pursuant to this section, to a qualified beneficiary under the contract upon a qualifying event without evidence of insurability. The qualified beneficiary shall, upon election, be able to continue his or her coverage under the group benefit plan, subject to the contract’s terms and conditions, and subject to the requirements of this section. Except as otherwise provided in this section, continuation coverage shall be provided under the same terms and conditions that apply to similarly situated individuals under the group benefit plan.

(b) Every disability insurer shall also offer the continuation coverage to a qualified beneficiary who (1) elects continuation coverage under a group benefit plan as defined in this article or in Section 1366.21 of the Health and Safety Code, but whose continuation coverage is terminated under the group benefit plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10128.57, prior to any other termination date specified in Section 10128.57, or (2) who elects coverage through the disability insurer during any employer open enrollment, and the employer has contracted with the disability insurer to provide coverage to the employer’s active employees. This continuation coverage shall be provided only for the balance of the period that the qualified beneficiary would have remained covered under the prior group benefit plan had the employer not terminated the contract with the previous insurer or health care service plan.

(c) Every disability insurer shall offer a qualified beneficiary the ability to elect the same core, noncore, or core and noncore coverage that the qualified beneficiary had immediately prior to the qualifying event.

(d) Any child who is born to a former employee who is a qualified beneficiary who has elected continuation coverage pursuant to this section, or a child who is placed for adoption with a former employee who is a qualified beneficiary who has elected continuation coverage pursuant to this article during the period of continuation coverage provided by this article shall be considered a qualified beneficiary entitled to receive benefits pursuant to this article for the remainder of the period that the former employee is covered pursuant to this article, if the child is enrolled under a group benefit plan as a dependent of that former employee who is a qualified beneficiary within 30 days of the child’s birth or placement for adoption.

(e) An individual who becomes a qualified beneficiary pursuant to this article shall continue to receive coverage pursuant to this article until continuation coverage is terminated at the qualified beneficiary’s election or pursuant to Section 10128.57, whichever comes first, even if the employer that sponsored the group benefit plan that is continued subsequently becomes subject to Section 4980B of the United States Internal Revenue Code of Chapter 18 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq.

(f) A qualified beneficiary electing coverage pursuant to this section shall be considered part of the group benefit plan and treated as similarly situated employees for contract purposes, unless otherwise specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 107, Sec. 17.   Effective July 6, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.54.

(a) Every insurer’s evidence of coverage for group benefit plans subject to this article, that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 1999, shall disclose to covered employees of group benefit plans subject to this article the ability to continue coverage pursuant to this article, as required by this section.

(b) This disclosure shall state that all insureds who are eligible to be qualified beneficiaries, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 10128.51, shall be required, as a condition of receiving benefits pursuant to this article, to notify, in writing, the insurer, or the employer if the employer contracts to perform the administrative services as provided for in Section 10128.55, of all qualifying events as specified in paragraphs (1), (3), (4), and (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51 within 60 days of the date of the qualifying event. This disclosure shall inform insureds that failure to make the notification to the insurer, or to the employer when under contract to provide the administrative services, within the required 60 days will disqualify the qualified beneficiary from receiving continuation coverage pursuant to this article. The disclosure shall further state that a qualified beneficiary who wishes to continue coverage under the group benefit plan pursuant to this article must request the continuation in writing and deliver the written request, by first-class mail, or other reliable means of delivery, including personal delivery, express mail, or private courier company, to the disability insurer, or to the employer if the plan has contracted with the employer for administrative services pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10128.55, within the 60-day period following the later of (1) the date that the insured’s coverage under the group benefit plan terminated or will terminate by reason of a qualifying event, or (2) the date the insured was sent notice pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 10128.55 of the ability to continue coverage under the group benefit plan. The disclosure required by this section shall also state that a qualified beneficiary electing continuation shall pay to the disability insurer, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the policy or contract, which shall be set forth in the notice to the qualified beneficiary pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10128.55, the amount of the required premium payment, as set forth in Section 10128.56. The disclosure shall further require that the qualified beneficiary’s first premium payment required to establish premium payment be delivered by first-class mail, certified mail, or other reliable means of delivery, including personal delivery, express mail, or private courier company, to the disability insurer, or to the employer if the employer has contracted with the insurer to perform the administrative services pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10128.55, within 45 days of the date the qualified beneficiary provided written notice to the insurer or the employer, if the employer has contracted to perform the administrative services, of the election to continue coverage in order for coverage to be continued under this article. This disclosure shall also state that the first premium payment must equal an amount sufficient to pay all required premiums and all premiums due, and that failure to submit the correct premium amount within the 45-day period will disqualify the qualified beneficiary from receiving continuation coverage pursuant to this article.

(c) The disclosure required by this section shall also describe separately how qualified beneficiaries whose continuation coverage terminates under a prior group benefit plan pursuant to Section 10128.57 may continue their coverage for the balance of the period that the qualified beneficiary would have remained covered under the prior group benefit plan, including the requirements for election and payment. The disclosure shall clearly state that continuation coverage shall terminate if the qualified beneficiary fails to comply with the requirements pertaining to enrollment in, and payment of premiums to, the new group benefit plan within 30 days of receiving notice of the termination of the prior group benefit plan.

(d) Prior to August 1, 1998, every insurer shall provide to all covered employees of employers subject to this article written notice containing the disclosures required by this section, or shall provide to all covered employees of employers subject to this article a new or amended evidence of coverage that includes the disclosures required by this section. Any insurer that, in the ordinary course of business, maintains only the addresses of employer group purchasers of benefits, and does not maintain addresses of covered employees, may comply with the notice requirements of this section through the provision of the notices to its employer group purchases of benefits.

(e) Every disclosure form issued, amended, or renewed on and after January 1, 1999, for a group benefit plan subject to this article shall provide a notice that, under state law, an insured may be entitled to continuation of group coverage and that additional information regarding eligibility for this coverage may be found in the evidence of coverage.

(f) Every disclosure form issued, amended, or renewed on and after July 1, 2006, for a group benefit plan subject to this article shall include the following notice:

“Please examine your options carefully before declining this coverage. You should be aware that companies selling individual health insurance typically require a review of your medical history that could result in a higher premium or you could be denied coverage entirely.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 526, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10128.55.

(a) Every group benefit plan contract between a disability insurer and an employer subject to this article that is issued, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 1998, shall require the employer to notify the insurer in writing of any employee who has had a qualifying event, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 10128.51, within 30 days of the qualifying event. The group contract shall also require the employer to notify the insurer, in writing, within 30 days of the date when the employer becomes subject to Section 4980B of the United States Internal Revenue Code or Chapter 18 of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 1161 et seq.

(b) Every group benefit plan contract between a disability insurer and an employer subject to this article that is issued, amended, or renewed after July 1, 1998, shall require the employer to notify qualified beneficiaries currently receiving continuation coverage, whose continuation coverage will terminate under one group benefit plan prior to the end of the period the qualified beneficiary would have remained covered, as specified in Section 10128.57, of the qualified beneficiary’s ability to continue coverage under a new group benefit plan for the balance of the period the qualified beneficiary would have remained covered under the prior group benefit plan. This notice shall be provided either 30 days prior to the termination or when all enrolled employees are notified, whichever is later.

Every disability insurer shall provide to the employer replacing a group benefit plan policy issued by the insurer, or to the employer’s agent or broker
 representative, within 15 days of any written request, information in possession of the insurer reasonably required to administer the notification requirements of this subdivision and subdivision (c).

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the group benefit plan contract between the insurer and the employer shall require the employer to notify the successor plan in writing of the qualified beneficiaries currently receiving continuation coverage so that the successor plan, or contracting employer or administrator, may provide those qualified beneficiaries with the necessary premium information, enrollment forms, and instructions consistent with the disclosure required by subdivision (c) of Section 10128.54 and subdivision (e) of this section to allow the qualified beneficiary to continue coverage. This information shall be sent to all qualified beneficiaries who are enrolled in the group benefit plan and those qualified beneficiaries who have been
 notified, pursuant to Section 10128.54 of their ability to continue their coverage and may still elect coverage within the specified 60-day period. This information shall be sent to the qualified beneficiary’s last known address, as provided to the employer by the health care service plan or, disability insurer currently providing continuation coverage to the qualified beneficiary. The successor insurer shall not be obligated to provide this information to qualified beneficiaries if the employer or prior insurer or health care service plan fails to comply with this section.

(d) A disability insurer may contract with an employer, or an administrator, to perform the administrative obligations of the plan as required by this article, including required notifications and collecting and forwarding premiums to the insurer. Except for the requirements of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), this subdivision shall not be construed to permit an insurer to
 require an employer to perform the administrative obligations of the insurer as required by this article as a condition of the issuance or renewal of coverage.

(e) Every insurer, or employer or administrator that contracts to perform the notice and administrative services pursuant to this section, shall, within 14 days of receiving a notice of a qualifying event, provide to the qualified beneficiary the necessary premium information, enrollment forms, and disclosures consistent with the notice requirements contained in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 10128.54 to allow the qualified beneficiary to formally elect continuation coverage. This information shall be sent to the qualified beneficiary’s last known address.

(f) Every insurer, or employer or administrator that contracts to perform the notice and administrative services pursuant to this section, shall, during the 180-day
 period ending on the date that continuation coverage is terminated pursuant to paragraphs (1), (3), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10128.57, notify a qualified beneficiary who has elected continuation coverage pursuant to this article of the date that his or her coverage will terminate, and shall notify the qualified beneficiary of any conversion coverage available to that qualified beneficiary. This requirement shall not apply when the continuation coverage is terminated because the group contract between the insurer and the employer is being terminated.

(g) (1) An insurer shall provide to a qualified beneficiary who has a qualifying event during the period specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA, a written notice containing information on the availability of premium assistance under ARRA. This notice shall be sent to the qualified beneficiary’s last known address.
 The notice shall include clear and easily understandable language to inform the qualified beneficiary that changes in federal law provide a new opportunity to elect continuation coverage with a 65-percent premium subsidy and shall include all of the following:

(A) The amount of the premium the person will pay. For qualified beneficiaries who had a qualifying event between September 1, 2008, and May 12, 2009, inclusive, if an insurer is unable to provide the correct premium amount in the notice, the notice may contain the last known premium amount and an opportunity for the qualified beneficiary to request, through a toll-free telephone number, the correct premium that would apply to the beneficiary.

(B) Enrollment forms and any other information required to be included pursuant to subdivision (e) to allow the qualified beneficiary to elect continuation coverage. This information
 shall not be included in notices sent to qualified beneficiaries currently enrolled in continuation coverage.

(C) A description of the option to enroll in different coverage as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA. This description shall advise the qualified beneficiary to contact the covered employee’s former employer for prior approval to choose this option.

(D) The eligibility requirements for premium assistance in the amount of 65 percent of the premium under Section 3001 of ARRA.

(E) The duration of premium assistance available under ARRA.

(F) A statement that a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA may elect continuation coverage no later than 60 days of the date of the
 notice.

(G) A statement that a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA who rejected or discontinued continuation coverage prior to receiving the notice required by this subdivision has the right to withdraw that rejection and elect continuation coverage with the premium assistance.

(H) A statement that reads as follows: 
“IF YOU ARE HAVING ANY DIFFICULTIES READING OR UNDERSTANDING THIS NOTICE, PLEASE CONTACT [name of insurer] at [insert appropriate telephone number].”
(2) With respect to qualified beneficiaries who had a qualifying event between September 1, 2008, and May 12, 2009, inclusive, the notice described in this subdivision shall be provided by the later of
 May 26, 2009, or seven business days after the date the insurer receives notice of the qualifying event.

(3) With respect to qualified beneficiaries who had or have a qualifying event between May 13, 2009, and the later date specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA, inclusive, the notice described in this subdivision shall be provided within the period of time specified in subdivision (e).

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an insurer to provide the insurer’s evidence of coverage as a part of the notice required by this subdivision, and nothing in this section shall be construed to require an insurer to amend its existing evidence of coverage to comply with the changes made to this section by the enactment of Assembly Bill 23 of the 2009–10 Regular Session or by the act amending this section during the second
 year of the 2009–10 Regular Session.

(5) The requirement under this subdivision to provide a written notice to a qualified beneficiary and the requirement under paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) to provide a new opportunity to a qualified beneficiary to elect continuation coverage shall be deemed satisfied if an insurer previously provided a written notice and additional election opportunity under Section 3001 of ARRA to that qualified beneficiary
 prior to the effective date of the act adding this paragraph.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA may elect continuation coverage no later than 60 days after the date of the notice required by subdivision (g).

(2) For a qualified beneficiary who elects to continue coverage pursuant to this subdivision, the period beginning on the date of the qualifying event and ending on the effective date of the continuation coverage shall be disregarded for purposes of calculating a break in coverage in determining whether a preexisting condition provision applies under subdivision (e) of Section 10198.7 or subdivision (c) of Section 10708.

(3) For a qualified beneficiary who had a qualifying event between September 1, 2008,
 and February 16, 2009, inclusive, and who elects continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (1), the continuation coverage shall commence on the first day of the month following the election.

(4) For a qualified beneficiary who had a qualifying event between February 17, 2009, and May 12, 2009, inclusive, and who elects continuation coverage pursuant to paragraph (1), the effective date of the continuation coverage shall be either of the following, at the option of the beneficiary, provided that the beneficiary pays the applicable premiums:

(A) The date of the qualifying event.

(B) The first day of the month following the election. 

(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a qualified beneficiary who is eligible for the special election period
 described in paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA may elect continuation coverage no later than 60 days after the date of the notice required under subdivision (j). For a qualified beneficiary who elects coverage pursuant to this paragraph, the continuation coverage shall be effective as of the first day of the first period of coverage after the date of termination of employment, except, if federal law permits, coverage shall take effect on the first day of the month following the election. However, for purposes of calculating the duration of continuation coverage pursuant to Section 10128.57, the period of that coverage shall be determined as though the qualifying event was a reduction of hours of the employee.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a qualified beneficiary who is eligible for any other special election period under ARRA may elect continuation coverage no later than 60 days after the date of the
 special election notice required under ARRA.

(i) An insurer shall provide a qualified beneficiary eligible for premium assistance under ARRA written notice of the extension of that premium assistance as required under Section 3001 of ARRA.

(j) A health insurer, or an administrator or employer if administrative obligations have been assumed by those entities pursuant to subdivision (d), shall give the qualified beneficiaries described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3001 of ARRA the written notice required by that paragraph by implementing the following procedures:

(1) The insurer shall, within 14 days of the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, send a notice to employers currently contracting with the insurer for a group benefit plan subject to this article. The
 notice shall do all of the following:

(A) Advise the employer that employees whose employment is terminated on or after March 2, 2010, who were previously enrolled in any group health care service plan or health insurance policy offered by the employer may be entitled to special health coverage rights, including a subsidy paid by the federal government for a portion of the premium.

(B) Ask the employer to provide the insurer with the name, address, and date of termination of employment for any employee whose employment is terminated on or after March 2, 2010, and who was at any time covered by any health care service plan or health insurance policy offered to their employees on or after September 1, 2008.

(C) Provide employers with a format and instructions for submitting the information to the insurer, or their